Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.085

Investments in accordance with established standards.

Any investments under RCW 43.84.150 by the state investment board shall be made in accordance with the standards established in RCW 43.33A.140.

[ 1998 c 14 s 2; 1977 ex.s. c 251 s 7.]